North Carolina, session 2025, SB808.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 88B of the General Statutes, as amended by S.L. 2025-20,
reads as rewritten:
"Chapter 88B.
"Cosmetic Art.
"§ 88B-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the North Carolina Cosmetic Art Act.
"§ 88B-2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Apprentice. – A person who is not a manager or operator and who is engaged
in learning the practice of cosmetic art under the direction and supervision of
a cosmetologist.
(2) Board. – The North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners.
(3) Booth. – A workstation located within a licensed cosmetic art shop or mobile
cosmetic art shop that is operated primarily by one individual in performing
cosmetic art services for consumers.
(4) Booth renter. – A person who rents a booth in a cosmetic art shop.shop or
mobile cosmetic art shop.
(5) Cosmetic art. – All or any part or combination of cosmetology, hair design,
esthetics, natural hair care, or manicuring, including the systematic
manipulation with the hands or mechanical apparatus of the scalp, face, neck,
shoulders, hands, and feet. Practices included within this subdivision shall not
include the practice of massage or bodywork therapy as set forth in Article 36
of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(6) Cosmetic art school. – Any building or part thereof where cosmetic art is
taught.
(7) Cosmetic art shop. – Any building or part thereof where cosmetic art is
practiced for pay or reward, whether direct or indirect.
*S808-v-4*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Cosmetologist. – Any individual who is licensed to practice all parts of
cosmetic art.
(8a) Cosmetology. – The act of arranging, dressing, curling, waving, cleansing,
cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, or similar work upon the hair of a
person by any means, including the use of hands, mechanical or electrical
apparatus, or appliances or by use of cosmetic or chemical preparations or
antiseptics.
(9) Cosmetology teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach all parts
of cosmetic art.
(10) Esthetician. – An individual licensed by the Board to practice only that part of
cosmetic art that constitutes skin care.
(11) Esthetician teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach only that
part of cosmetic art that constitutes skin care.
(11a) Esthetics. – Refers to any of the following practices: giving facials; applying
makeup; performing skin care; removing superfluous hair from the body of a
person by use of creams, tweezers, or waxing; applying eyelashes to a person,
including the application of eyelash extensions, brow or lash color;
beautifying the face, neck, arms, or upper part of the human body by use of
cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams; surface
manipulation in relation to skin care; or cleaning or stimulating the face, neck,
ears, arms, hands, bust, torso, legs, or feet of a person by means of hands,
devices, apparatus, or appliances along with the use of cosmetic preparations,
antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.
(11b) Hair design. – The act of (i) arranging, dressing, curling, waving, cleansing,
cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, or similar work upon the hair of a
person by any means, including the use of hands, mechanical or electrical
apparatus, or appliances or by use of cosmetic or chemical preparations or
antiseptics; or (ii) removing superfluous hair from the face of a person by use
of waxing.
(11c) Hair design teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach hair
design.
(11d) Hair designer. – An individual licensed by the Board to practice only that part
of cosmetic art that constitutes hair design.
(11e) Licensee. – An individual who holds one or more licenses or certifications
issued by the Board.
(12) Manicuring. – The care and treatment of the fingernails, toenails, cuticles on
fingernails and toenails, and the hands and feet, including the decoration of
the fingernails and the application of nail extensions and artificial nails. The
term "manicuring" shall not include the treatment of pathologic conditions.
(13) Manicurist. – An individual licensed by the Board to practice only that part of
cosmetic art that constitutes manicuring.
(14) Manicurist teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach
manicuring.
(14a) Mobile cosmetic art shop. – A motor home as defined in Article 1 of Chapter
20 of the General Statutes that is used for the practice of cosmetic art for pay
or reward, whether direct or indirect.
(14b) Natural hair care. – A service that results in tension on hair strands or roots by
twisting, wrapping, extending, or locking hair by hand or mechanical device.
For purposes of this definition, the phrase "natural hair care" shall include the
use of artificial or natural hair.
Page 2 Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(14b)(14c) Natural hair care specialist. – An individual licensed certified by the Board
to practice only that part of cosmetic art that constitutes natural hair care.
(14c) Natural hair care teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach
natural hair care.
(15) Shampooing. – The application and removal of commonly used, room
temperature, liquid hair cleaning and hair conditioning products. Shampooing
does not include the arranging, dressing, waving, coloring, or other treatment
of the hair.
…
"§ 88B-4. Powers and duties of the Board.
(a) The Board shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To administer and interpret this Chapter.
(2) To adopt, amend, and repeal rules to carry out the provisions of this Chapter.
(3) To examine and determine the qualifications and fitness of applicants for
licensure under this Chapter.
(4) To issue, renew, deny, restrict, suspend, or revoke licenses.
(5) To conduct investigations of alleged violations of this Chapter or the Board's
rules.
(6) To collect fees required by G.S. 88B-20 and any other monies permitted by
law to be paid to the Board.
(7) To approve new cosmetic art schools.
(7a) To adopt rules for cosmetic art schools.
(8) To inspect cosmetic art schools and shops.schools, cosmetic art shops, and
mobile cosmetic art shops.
(9) To adopt rules for the sanitary management and physical requirements of
cosmetic art shops shops, mobile cosmetic art shops, and cosmetic art schools.
(10) To establish a curriculum for each course of study required for the issuance of
a license or certification issued under this Chapter.
(11) To employ an executive director and any additional professional, clerical, or
special personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter, and to
purchase or rent necessary office space, equipment, and supplies.
(12) To adopt a seal.
(13) To carry out any other actions authorized by this Chapter.
(b) A member of the Board shall have the authority to inspect cosmetic art shops shops,
mobile cosmetic art shops, and cosmetic art schools at any reasonable hour to determine
compliance with the provisions of this Chapter if the inspection is made: (i) at the request of the
Board, or with the approval of the chair or the executive director as the result of a complaint
made to the Board or a problem reported by an inspector, or (ii) at the request of an inspector
who deems it necessary to request the assistance of a Board member and who has the prior
approval of the chair or executive director to do so. A Board member who makes an inspection
pursuant to this subsection shall file a report with the Board before requesting reimbursement for
expenses.
(c) The Board shall keep a record of its proceedings relating to the issuance, renewal,
denial, restriction, suspension, and revocation of licenses. licenses and certifications. This record
shall also contain each licensee's name, business and home addresses, license number, and the
date the license was issued.
(d) The Board shall offer or approve a 10-hour course in infection control for natural hair
care specialists. The Board shall make available at least one qualifying course on its website, free
of charge.
"§ 88B-5. Meetings and compensation of the Board.
Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) Each member of the Board shall receive compensation for services and expenses as
provided in G.S. 93B-5, but shall be limited to payment for services deemed official business of
the Board when such business exceeds three continuous hours per day. Official business of the
Board includes meetings called by the chair and time spent inspecting cosmetic art shops and
shops, mobile cosmetic art shops, and cosmetic art schools as permitted by this Chapter. No
payment for per diem or travel expenses shall be authorized or paid for Board meetings other
than those called by the chair. The Board may annually select one member to attend a national
state board of cosmetic arts meeting on official business of the Board. No other Board members
shall be authorized to attend trade shows or to travel out-of-state at the Board's expense.
(b) The Board shall hold four regular meetings a year in the months of January, April,
July, and October. The chair may call additional meetings whenever necessary.
"§ 88B-6. Board office, employees, funds, budget requirements.
(a) The Board shall maintain its office in Wake County, North Carolina.
(b) The Board shall employ an executive director who shall not be a member of the Board.
The executive director shall keep all records of the Board, issue all necessary notices, and
perform any other duties required by the Board.
(c) With the approval of the Director of the Budget and the Office of State Human
Resources, the Board may employ as many inspectors, investigators, and other staff as necessary
to perform inspections and other duties prescribed by the Board. Inspectors and investigators
shall be experienced in all parts of cosmetic art and shall have authority to examine cosmetic art
shops shops, mobile cosmetic art shops, and cosmetic art schools during business hours to
determine compliance with this Chapter.
"§ 88B-7. Qualifications for licensing cosmetologists.
The Board shall issue a license to practice as a cosmetologist to any individual who meets all
of the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of at least 1,500 1,200 hours of a cosmetology
curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school, or at least 1,200 hours of a
cosmetology curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school and completion
of an apprenticeship for a period of at least six months under the direct
supervision of a cosmetologist, as certified by sworn affidavit of three licensed
cosmetologists or by other evidence satisfactory to the Board.school.
(2) Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
"§ 88B-8. Qualifications for licensing apprentices.
The Board shall issue a license to practice as an apprentice to any individual who meets all
of the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of at least 1,200 hours of a cosmetology curriculum in
an approved cosmetic art school.
(2) Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
"§ 88B-8.1. Qualifications for licensing as a hair designer.
The Board shall issue a license to practice as a hair designer to any individual who meets all
of the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of at least 900 hours of a hair design curriculum in an
approved cosmetic art school.
(2) Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
"§ 88B-9. Qualifications for licensing as an esthetician.
The Board shall issue a license to practice as an esthetician to any individual who meets all
of the following requirements:
Page 4 Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Successful completion of at least 600 hours of an esthetics curriculum in an
approved cosmetic art school.school, or, for a licensed hair designer,
successful completion of at least 300 hours of an esthetics curriculum in an
approved cosmetic art school.
(2) Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
"§ 88B-10. Qualifications for licensing manicurists.
The Board shall issue a license to practice as a manicurist to any individual who meets all of
the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of at least 300 hours of a manicurist curriculum in an
approved cosmetic art school.school, or, for a licensed hair designer,
successful completion of at least 100 hours of a manicurist curriculum in an
approved cosmetic art school.
(2) Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
"§ 88B-10.1. Qualifications for licensing certifying natural hair care specialists.
The Board shall issue a license to practice as a an infection control certification for a natural
hair care specialist to any individual who meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of at least 300 hours of a natural hair care curriculum
in an approved cosmetic art school.10 hours of an infection control curriculum
for natural hair care specialists.
(2) Passage of an infection control examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
"§ 88B-11. Qualifications for licensing teachers.
(a) Applicants for any teacher's license issued by the Board shall meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) Possession of a high school diploma or a high school graduation equivalency
certificate.
(2) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
(b) The Board shall issue a license to practice as a cosmetology teacher to any individual
who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and who meets all of the following:
(1) Holds in good standing a cosmetologist license issued by the Board.
(2) Submits proof of either practice of cosmetic art in a cosmetic art shop, shop
or mobile cosmetic art shop, or any Board-approved employment capacity in
the cosmetic arts industry, for a period equivalent to one year of full-time work
immediately prior to application or successful completion of at least 800 500
hours of a teacher curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
(3) Passes an examination for teachers conducted by the Board.
(b1) The Board shall issue a license to practice as a hair design teacher to any individual
who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and who meets all of the following:
(1) Holds in good standing a cosmetologist or a hair designer license issued by
the Board.
(2) Submits proof of either of the following:
a. Practice of hair design in a cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art
shop, or any Board-approved employment capacity in the cosmetic
arts industry, for a period equivalent to one year of full-time work
immediately prior to application.
b. Successful completion of at least 500 hours of a teacher curriculum in
an approved cosmetic art school.
(3) Passes an examination for teachers conducted by the Board.
Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Board shall issue a license to practice as an esthetician teacher to any individual
who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and who meets all of the following:
(1) Holds in good standing a cosmetologist or an esthetician license issued by the
Board.
(2) Submits proof of either practice as an esthetician in a cosmetic art shop, shop
or mobile cosmetic art shop, or any Board-approved employment capacity in
the cosmetic arts industry, for a period equivalent to one year of full-time work
immediately prior to application or successful completion of at least 650 500
hours of a teacher curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
(3) Passes an examination for teachers conducted by the Board.
(d) The Board shall issue a license to practice as a manicurist teacher to any individual
who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and who meets all of the following:
(1) Holds in good standing a cosmetologist or manicurist license issued by the
Board.
(2) Submits proof of either practice as a manicurist in a cosmetic art shop, shop
or mobile cosmetic art shop, or any Board-approved employment capacity in
the cosmetic arts industry, for a period equivalent to one year of full-time work
immediately prior to application or successful completion of at least 320 hours
of a teacher curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
(3) Passes an examination for teachers conducted by the Board.
(e) The Board shall issue a license to practice as a natural hair care teacher to any
individual who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and who meets all of the
following:
(1) Holds in good standing a natural hair care license issued by the Board.
(2) Submits proof of either practice as a natural hair care specialist in a cosmetic
art shop or any Board-approved employment capacity in the cosmetic art
industry for a period equivalent to one year of full-time work immediately
prior to application or successful completion of at least 320 hours of a teacher
curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
(3) Passes an examination for teachers conducted by the Board.
"§ 88B-12. Temporary employment permit; extensions; limits on practice.
(a) The Board shall issue a temporary employment permit to an applicant for licensure
as an apprentice, a cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or
manicurist who meets all of the following:
(1) Has completed the required hours of a cosmetic art school curriculum in the
area in which the applicant wishes to be licensed.
(2) Has applied to take the examination within three months of completing the
required hours.
(3) Is qualified to take the examination.
(b) A temporary employment permit shall expire six months from the date of graduation
from a cosmetic art school and shall not be renewed.
(c) The holder of a temporary employment permit may practice cosmetic art only under
the supervision of a licensed cosmetologist, hair designer, manicurist, natural hair care specialist,
or esthetician, as appropriate, and may not operate a cosmetic art shop.
"§ 88B-13. Applicants licensed in other states.
(a) The Board shall issue a license to an applicant licensed as an apprentice, a
cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist in another
state if the applicant shows:
(1) The applicant is an active practitioner in good standing.
(2) The applicant has practiced at least one of the three years immediately
preceding the application for a license.
Page 6 Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) There is no disciplinary proceeding or unresolved complaint pending against
the applicant at the time a license is to be issued by this State.
(4) The licensure requirements in the state in which the applicant is licensed are
substantially equivalent to those required by this State.
(b) Instead of meeting the requirements in subsection (a) of this section, any applicant
who is licensed as a cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or
manicurist in another state shall be admitted to practice in this State under the same reciprocity
or comity provisions that the state in which the applicant is licensed grants to persons licensed in
this State.
(c) The Board may establish standards for issuing a license to an applicant who is licensed
as a teacher in another state. These standards shall include a requirement that the licensure
requirements in the state in which the teacher is licensed shall be substantially equivalent to those
required in this State and that the applicant shall be licensed by the Board to practice in the area
in which the applicant is licensed to teach.
"§ 88B-14. Licensing of cosmetic art shops.shops and mobile cosmetic art shops.
(a) The Board shall issue a license to operate a cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art
shop to any applicant who submits a properly completed application, on a form approved by the
Board, pays the required fee, and is determined, after inspection, to be in compliance with the
provisions of this Chapter and the Board's rules.
(b) The applicant shall list all licensees who practice cosmetic art in the shop or mobile
cosmetic art shop and shall identify each as an employee or a booth renter.
(c) A cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art shop shall be allowed to operate for a
period of 30 days while the Board inspects and determines the shop's or mobile cosmetic art
shop's compliance with this Chapter and the Board's rules. If the Board is unable to complete the
inspection within 30 days, the shop or mobile cosmetic art shop will be authorized to operate
until such an inspection can be completed.
(d) A license to operate a cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art shop shall not be
transferable from one location to another or from one owner to another.
"§ 88B-15. Practice outside cosmetic art shops.
(a) Any individual licensed or certified under this Chapter may visit the residences of
individuals who are sick or disabled and confined to their places of residence in order to attend
to their cosmetic needs. A licensed or certified individual may also visit hospitals, nursing homes,
rest homes, retirement homes, mental institutions, correctional facilities, funeral homes, and
similar institutions to attend to the cosmetic needs of those in these institutions.
(b) An individual licensed or certified under this Chapter may practice in a licensed
barbershop as permitted by G.S. 86A-14.G.S. 86B-32.
(c) A natural hair care specialist certified under this Chapter may practice natural hair
care at fairs, street festivals, holiday festivals, agricultural festivals, farmers markets, balloon
races, local fundraisers, and other similar events approved by the Board.
"§ 88B-15A. Mobile cosmetic art shops.
(a) The Board shall issue a license to operate a mobile cosmetic art shop to any applicant
who submits a properly completed application on a form approved by the Board, pays the
required fee, and is determined after inspection to be in compliance with the provisions of this
Chapter and the Board's rules.
(b) The Board shall adopt rules for the operation, permitting, and inspection of mobile
cosmetic art shops, including standards for facilities, personnel, and safety and sanitary
requirements. All permitting and operating requirements provided by this Chapter or by rules
adopted by the Board pursuant to this Chapter that apply to cosmetic art shops shall also apply
to mobile cosmetic art shops, except to the extent that the requirements conflict with this section
or with any rules adopted by the Board pursuant to this section.
Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) In addition to the requirements of this Chapter, individuals and the vehicles they
operate while providing mobile cosmetic art services shall be subject to the provisions of (i)
Chapter 20 of the General Statutes, (ii) Title 19A of the North Carolina Administrative Code,
(iii) all applicable OSHA requirements, and (iv) all local laws and ordinances regulating business
establishments.
(d) A mobile cosmetic art shop must be equipped with a functional sink and toilet
facilities and must maintain an adequate supply of clean water and wastewater storage capacity.
(e) No cosmetic art service may be performed in a mobile cosmetic art shop while the
mobile cosmetic art shop is moving. The mobile cosmetic art shop must be safely parked in a
legal parking spot at all times while patrons are present inside the mobile cosmetic art shop.
(f) A mobile cosmetic art shop owner must maintain a permanent business address at
which records of appointments, itineraries, license numbers, and vehicle identification numbers
for each mobile cosmetic art shop being operated shall be kept and made available for verification
and inspection by the Board and at which all correspondence from the Board can be received.
(g) To facilitate periodic inspections of mobile cosmetic art shops, prior to the beginning
of each month, the owner of the mobile cosmetic art shop shall provide to the Board a written
monthly itinerary listing locations, dates, and hours of operation for the mobile cosmetic art shop.
…
"§ 88B-18. Examinations.
(a) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-212, s. 2, effective August 8, 2006.
(b) Each examination shall have both a practical and a written portion.
(c) Examinations for applicants for apprentice, cosmetologist, hair designer, teacher,
esthetician, natural hair care specialist, and manicurist licenses shall be given in at least three
locations in the State that are geographically scattered. The examinations shall be administered
in Board-approved facilities.
(d) An applicant for a cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, manicurist, natural hair
care specialist, or teacher's license license, or natural hair care specialist certification, who fails
to pass the examination three times may not reapply to take the examination again until after the
applicant has successfully completed any additional requirements prescribed by the Board.
"§ 88B-19. Expired school credits.
No credit shall be approved by the Board if five years or more have elapsed from the date a
person enrolled in a cosmetic art school unless the person completed the required number of
hours and filed an application to take an examination administered by the Board.
"§ 88B-20. Fees required.
(a) The Board may charge the applicant the actual cost of preparation, administration,
and grading of examinations for cosmetologists, apprentices, hair designers, manicurists,
estheticians, natural hair care specialist, specialists, or teachers, in addition to its other fees.
(b) The Board may charge application fees as follows:
(1) Inspection of a newly established cosmetic art shop .......................... $ 25.00
(1a) Inspection of a newly established mobile cosmetic art
shop ..................................................................................................... $ 25.00
(2) Reciprocity applicant under G.S. 88B-13 ........................................... $ 15.00.
(c) The Board may charge license and certification fees as follows:
(1) Cosmetologist .................................................................. $ 39.00 every 3 years
(2) Apprentice ............................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(2a) Hair designer ........................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(3) Esthetician ............................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(4) Manicurist ............................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(4a) Natural hair care specialist ...................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(5) Teacher ............................................................................ $ 10.00 every 2 years
(6) Cosmetic art shop per active booth ........................................... $ 3.00 per year
Page 8 Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6a) Mobile cosmetic art shop per active booth ............................... $ 3.00 per year
(7) Cosmetic art school ................................................................. $ 50.00 per year
(8) Duplicate license ................................................................................... $ 1.00.
(d) The Board may require payment of late fees and reinstatement fees as follows:
(1) Apprentice, cosmetologist, Cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician,
manicurist,
natural hair care specialist, and teacher late renewal .......................... $ 10.00
(2) Cosmetic art schools and shops and mobile cosmetic art
shops late renewal ............................................................................... $ 10.00
(3) Reinstatement – cosmetic art schools and shops and mobile cosmetic art shops
$ 25.00.
(e) The Board may prorate fees as appropriate.
"§ 88B-21. Renewals; expired licenses; inactive status.
(a) Each license to operate a cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art shop shall be
renewed on or before the first day of February of each year. As provided in G.S. 88B-20, a late
fee shall be charged for licenses renewed after February 1. Any license not renewed by March 1
of each year shall expire. A cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art shop whose license has
been expired for one year or less shall have the license reinstated immediately upon payment of
the reinstatement fee, the late fee, and all unpaid license fees. The licensee shall submit to the
Board, as a part of the renewal process, a list of all licensed cosmetologists who practice cosmetic
art in the shop and shall identify each as an employee or a booth renter.
(b) Cosmetologist licenses shall be renewed on or before October 1 every three years
beginning October 1, 1998. A late fee shall be charged for renewals after that date. Any license
not renewed shall expire on October 1 of the year that renewal is required. The Board may
develop and implement a plan for staggered license renewal and may prorate license fees to
implement such a plan.
(c) Apprentice, Hair designer, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, and manicurist
licenses or certifications shall be renewed annually on or before October 1 of each year. A late
fee shall be charged for the renewal of licenses or certifications after that date. Any license or
certification not renewed shall expire on October 1 of that year.
(d) Teacher licenses shall be renewed every two years on or before October 1. A late fee
shall be charged for the renewal of licenses after that date. Any license not renewed shall expire
on October 1 of that year.
(e) Prior to renewal of a certification or license, a teacher, cosmetologist, hair designer,
esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist shall annually complete eight four hours of
Board-approved continuing education for each year of the licensing cycle. A cosmetologist may
complete up to 24 hours 12 hours of required continuing education at any time within the
cosmetologist's three-year licensing cycle. Licensees shall submit written documentation to the
Board showing that they have satisfied the requirements of this subsection. A licensee who is in
active practice as a cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or
manicurist, has practiced for at least 10 consecutive years in that profession, and is 60 years of
age or older does not have to meet the continuing education requirements of this subsection. A
licensee who is in active practice as a cosmetologist cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician,
natural hair care specialist, or manicurist and has at least 20 consecutive years of experience as a
cosmetologist, in that profession, does not have to meet the continuing education requirements
of this subsection, but shall report any continuing education classes completed to the Board,
whether the continuing education classes are Board-approved or not. Promotion of products and
systems shall be allowed at continuing education given in-house or at trade shows. Continuing
education classes may also be offered in secondary languages as needed. No member of the Board
may offer continuing education courses as required by this section.
Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(f) If an apprentice, a cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, manicurist, natural hair
care specialist, or teacher fails to renew his or her license or certification within five years
following the expiration date, the licensee shall be required to pass an examination as prescribed
by the Board before the license will be reinstated.
(g) Cosmetic art school licenses shall be renewed on or before October 1 of each year. A
late fee shall be charged for licenses renewed after that date. Any license not renewed by
November 1 of that year shall expire. A cosmetic art school whose license has been expired for
one year or less shall have its license reinstated upon payment of the reinstatement fee, the late
fee, and all unpaid license fees.
(h) Upon request by a licensee for inactive status, the Board may place the licensee's
name on the inactive list so long as the licensee is in good standing with the Board. An inactive
licensee is not required to complete continuing education requirements. An inactive licensee shall
not practice cosmetic art for consideration. However, the inactive licensee may continue to
purchase supplies as accorded an active licensee. When the inactive licensee desires to be
removed from the inactive list and return to active practice, the inactive licensee shall notify the
Board of his or her desire to return to active status and pay the required fee as determined by the
Board. As a condition of returning to active status, the Board may require the licensee to complete
eight to 24 hours of continuing education pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.
"§ 88B-22. Licenses and certifications required; criminal penalty.
(a) Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may practice or attempt to practice
cosmetic art for pay or reward in any form, either directly or indirectly, without being licensed
or certified as an apprentice, a cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, natural hair care
specialist, or manicurist by the Board.
(b) Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may practice cosmetic art or any part
of cosmetic art, for pay or reward in any form, either directly or indirectly, outside of a licensed
cosmetic art shop.shop or mobile cosmetic art shop.
(c) No person may open or operate a cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art shop in
this State unless a license has been issued by the Board for that shop.shop or mobile cosmetic art
shop.
(d) An individual certified or licensed as an esthetician, hair designer, natural hair care
specialist, or manicurist may practice only that part of cosmetic art for which the individual is
certified or licensed.
(d1) No person may teach cosmetic art in a Board-approved cosmetic art school unless the
person is a teacher licensed under this Chapter. A guest lecturer may be exempt from the
requirements of this subsection upon approval by the Board.
(e) An apprentice licensed under the provisions of this Chapter shall apprentice under the
direct supervision of a cosmetologist. An apprentice shall not operate a cosmetic art shop.
(f) A violation of this Chapter is a Class 3 misdemeanor.
"§ 88B-23. Licenses and certifications to be posted.
(a) Every apprentice, cosmetologist, hair designer, esthetician, manicurist, natural hair
care specialist, and teacher licensed under this Chapter shall display the certificate of license
issued by the Board within the shop in which the person works.
(b) Every certificate of license to operate a cosmetic art shop or shop, mobile cosmetic
art shop, or cosmetic art school shall be conspicuously posted in the shop or school for which it
is issued.
(c) Every natural hair care specialist shall conspicuously display the infection control
certification issued by the Board at any place where the natural hair care specialist is practicing
natural hair care.
"§ 88B-24. Revocation of licenses and other disciplinary measures.
The Board may restrict, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate any license
for any of the following:
Page 10 Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Conviction of a felony shown by certified copy of the record of the court of
conviction.
(2) Gross malpractice or gross incompetency as determined by the Board.
(3) Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements.
(4) Permitting any individual to practice cosmetic art without a license license,
infection control certification, or temporary employment permit, with an
expired license or temporary employment permit, or with an invalid license
license, infection control certification, or temporary employment permit.
(5) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license for money or other thing of value
other than the required fee or by fraudulent misrepresentation.
(6) Practicing or attempting to practice by fraudulent misrepresentation.
(7) Willful failure to display a certificate of license or an infection control
certification as required by G.S. 88B-23.
(8) Willful violation of the rules adopted by the Board.
(9) Violation of G.S. 86A-15 G.S. 86B-31 by a cosmetologist, hair designer,
esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist licensed or certified by
the Board and practicing cosmetic art in a barber shop.
"§ 88B-25. Exemptions.
The following persons are exempt from the provisions of this Chapter while engaged in the
proper discharge of their professional duties:
(1) Undertakers and funeral establishments licensed under G.S. 90-210.25.
(2) Persons authorized to practice medicine or surgery under Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes.
(3) Nurses licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(4) Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army, Air
Force, Navy, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast Guard.
(5) A person employed in a cosmetic art shop or mobile cosmetic art shop whose
duties are expressly confined to the shampooing or blow drying of hair,
provided that the person shall comply with rules adopted by the Board relating
to sanitary management of cosmetic art shops.shops and mobile cosmetic art
shops.
"§ 88B-26. Rules to be posted.
(a) The Board shall furnish a copy of its rules relating to sanitary management of
cosmetic art shops shops, mobile cosmetic art shops, and cosmetic art schools to each shop shop,
mobile cosmetic art shop, and school licensed by the Board. Each shop shop, mobile cosmetic
art shop, and school shall post the rules in a conspicuous place.
(b) The Board shall furnish a copy of its rules relating to curriculum and schools to each
licensed cosmetic art school. Each cosmetic art school shall make these rules available to all
teachers and students.
"§ 88B-27. Inspections.
Any inspector or other authorized representative of the Board may enter any cosmetic art
shop or shop, mobile cosmetic art shop, or cosmetic art school to inspect it for compliance with
this Chapter and the Board's rules. All persons practicing cosmetic art in a shop shop, mobile
cosmetic art shop, or school shall, upon request, present satisfactory proof of identification.
Satisfactory proof shall be in the form of a photographic driver's license or photographic
identification card issued by any state, federal, or other government entity. The Board may
require a cosmetic art shop or shop, mobile cosmetic art shop, or cosmetic art school to be
inspected as a condition for license renewal.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 86B-32 reads as rewritten:
"§ 86B-32. Persons exempt from the provisions of this Article.
Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The following persons are exempt from the provisions of this Article while engaged in the
proper discharge of their duties:
(1) Persons authorized under the laws of the State to practice medicine and
surgery, and those working under their supervision.
(2) Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army or other
components of the Armed Forces of the United States, and those working
under their supervision.
(3) Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses and those working under their
supervision.
(4) Licensed embalmers and funeral directors and those working under their
supervision.
(5) Persons who are working in licensed cosmetic shops or beauty schools and
are licensed or certified by the State Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners
pursuant to Chapter 88B of the General Statutes.
(6) Persons who are working in barbershops and are licensed or certified by the
State Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners pursuant to Chapter 88B of the
General Statutes, provided that those persons shall comply with G.S. 86B-31.
(7) Inmates under the jurisdiction of the North Carolina Department of Adult
Correction.
(8) Persons who are employed by barbershops and whose duties are expressly
confined to the shampooing or blow drying of hair, provided that the person
shall comply with G.S. 86B-31."
SECTION 3.(a) Transition from Licenses to Certifications. – The following
provisions shall govern the transition from natural hair care specialist licenses previously
required for practice under Chapter 88B of the General Statutes to infection control certifications
for natural hair care specialists under this act:
(1) Automatic conversion. – All individuals holding valid natural hair care
specialist licenses issued by the North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art
Examiners as of December 31, 2026, shall automatically be deemed to hold
the equivalent infection control certification under Chapter 88B of the General
Statutes, as amended by this act, without further examination, application,
fees, or additional qualification requirements. The Board shall provide any
individual who is deemed to hold an infection control certification under this
subsection with an infection control certification free of charge.
(2) Pending applications. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
application for a natural hair care specialist license submitted to the Board
prior to December 31, 2026, and still pending on that date shall be granted as
an infection control certification if the applicant meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Successful completion of at least 300 hours of a natural hair care
curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
b. Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
SECTION 3.(b) Transition from Apprentice Licenses to Cosmetologist Licenses. –
The following provisions shall govern the transition from apprentice licenses previously required
for practice under Chapter 88B of the General Statutes to cosmetologist licenses under this act:
(1) Automatic conversion. – All individuals holding apprentice licenses issued by
the North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners as of December 31,
2026, shall automatically be deemed to hold a cosmetologist license without
further examination, application, fees, or additional qualification
requirements.
Page 12 Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Pending applications. – Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
application for an apprentice license submitted to the Board prior to December
31, 2026, and still pending on that date shall be granted as a cosmetologist
license if the applicant meets all of the following requirements:
a. Successful completion of at least 1,200 hours of a cosmetology
curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
b. Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
c. Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
(3) Renewal of licenses. – Upon expiration of an apprentice license, the Board
shall permit individuals to renew their credential as a cosmetologist license
without resubmission or additional qualifications.
SECTION 3.(c) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art
Examiners shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act. The Board shall prominently
post on its publicly available website information about all of the following:
(1) The elimination of the apprentice license and transition to cosmetologist
licensure.
(2) The elimination of the natural hair care specialist license and transition to
certification.
(3) The requirement for completion of the infection control course for newly
certified natural hair care specialists.
(4) Clear instructions for accessing at least one free Board-approved infection
control course that satisfies the requirements for infection control certification
for natural hair care specialists.
SECTION 3.(d) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Barber and Electrolysis
Examiners may adopt rules to implement Section 2 of this act.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective December 31, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 808-Fourth Edition Page 13